District of Columbia statutes.
38-912.01

Issuance of rules for programs established pursuant to § 38-912.

The Board of Education may issue rules necessary for the implementation and operation of programs of education and training as may be established by the Board pursuant to § 38-912.

Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-172, § 5, 29 DCR 5745

History

1981 Ed., § 31-2212.1.

Prior Codifications